Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 33
COLORADO SURFACE COAL
MINING RECLAMATION ACT

Section

34-33-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Surface Coal Mining Reclamation Act".

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1254, § 1, effective July 1.

34-33-102. Legislative declaration.

It is declared to be the policy of this state that surface coal mining operations and the reclamation of land affected by such operations are both necessary and proper activities. The purpose of this article is to assure that the coal required for local and national energy needs and for economic and social well-being is provided and to provide a balance among the protection of the environment, agricultural productivity, and the need for coal as an essential source of energy. It is the intent of the general assembly by the enactment of this article to allow for the continued development of the surface coal mining operations in this state, while requiring those persons involved in surface coal mining operations to reclaim land affected by such operations as contemporaneously as possible with the surface coal mining operations so that the affected land may be put to a beneficial use. It is the further intent of the general assembly by the enactment of this article to protect society and the environment from the adverse effects of surface coal mining operations, assure that the rights of surface landowners and other persons with a legal interest in the land or appurtenances thereto are fully protected from such operations; assure that surface coal mining operations are not conducted where reclamation as required by this article is not feasible; and to assure that appropriate procedures are provided for the public participation in the development, revision, and enforcement of regulations, standards, reclamation plans, or programs established by the state under this article. It is the further intent of the general assembly to promote the reclamation of mined areas left without adequate reclamation prior to the enactment of this article and which continue, in their unreclaimed condition, to substantially degrade the quality of the environment, prevent or damage the beneficial use of land or water resources, or endanger the health or safety of the public, to aid in the protection of wildlife and aquatic resources, and to protect and promote the health, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state. It is the intent of the general assembly that, in the administration of this article, the small operator be assisted in complying with the provisions of this article, particularly in the areas of bonding, technical and administrative assistance, and timely processing of permit applications.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1254, § 1, effective July 1.

34-33-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Administrator" means the head of the office of mined land reclamation in the division of reclamation, mining, and safety in the department of natural resources.

"Alluvial valley floors" means the unconsolidated stream-laid deposits holding streams where water availability is sufficient for subirrigation or flood irrigation agricultural activities but does not include upland areas which are generally overlain by a thin veneer of colluvial deposits composed chiefly of debris from sheet erosion, deposits by unconcentrated runoff or slope wash, together with talus, other mass movement accumulation, and windblown deposits.

"Approximate original contour" means that surface configuration achieved by backfilling and grading of the mined area so that the reclaimed area, including any terracing or access roads, closely resembles the general surface configuration of the land prior to mining and blends into and complements the drainage pattern of the surrounding terrain, with all highwalls and spoil piles eliminated. Water impoundments may be permitted where the board determines that they are in compliance with section 34-33-120 (2)(h).

"Board" means the mined land reclamation board created pursuant to section 34-32-105.

"Complete permit application" means an application which minimally addresses each and every requirement of sections 34-33-110 and 34-33-111 and section 34-33-120 or 34-33-121.

"Department" means the department of natural resources.

"Division" means the division of reclamation, mining, and safety in the department of natural resources.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the department of natural resources.

"Federal land" means any land, including mineral interests, owned by the United States, but excluding Indian lands.

"Historic areas" means those lands which are listed or are eligible for listing in the national register of historic places or the state register of historic properties or which are designated pursuant to the federal "Historic Sites, Buildings, and Antiquities Act", as amended.

"Imminent danger to the health and safety of the public" means the existence of any condition or practice, or any violation of a permit or other requirement of this article, in a surface coal mining and reclamation operation which could reasonably be expected to cause substantial physical harm to persons outside the permit area before such condition, practice, or violation can be abated. A reasonable expectation of death or serious injury before abatement exists if a rational person, subjected to the same conditions, or practices giving rise to the peril, would not expose himself to the danger during the time necessary for abatement.

"Indian lands" means all lands, including, but not limited to, mineral interests and rights-of-way, within the exterior boundaries of any federal Indian reservation, notwithstanding the issuance of any patent, including mineral interests held in trust for or supervised by any Indian tribe.

"Indian tribe" means any Indian tribe, band, group, or community having a governing body recognized by the secretary of the United States department of the interior.

(13.5) "Office" means the office of mined land reclamation, created in section 34-32-105.

"Operator" means any person engaged in surface coal mining and reclamation operations who removes or intends to remove more than two hundred fifty tons of coal from the earth or from coal mine waste disposal facilities within twelve consecutive calendar months in any one location.

"Other minerals" means clay, stone, sand, gravel, metalliferous and nonmetalliferous ores, oil shale and oil extracted from shale by an in situ process, and any other solid material or substances of commercial value excavated in solid form from natural deposits on or in the earth, exclusive of coal and those minerals which occur naturally in liquid or gaseous form.

"Permit" means a permit to conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations.

"Permit applicant" or "applicant" means a person applying for a permit.

"Permit area" means the area of land indicated on the approved map submitted by the operator with his application, which area of land shall be covered by the operator's bond as required by section 34-33-113 and shall be readily identifiable by appropriate markers on the site.

"Permit revision" means a significant alteration of the terms or requirements of a permit issued pursuant to this article, including, but not limited to, significant changes in the reclamation plan, and other actions which the board may by regulation prescribe. "Permit revision" does not include a technical revision as defined in subsection (27) of this section.

"Permittee" means a person holding a permit.

"Person" means an individual, partnership, association, society, joint stock company, firm, company, corporation, Indian tribe conducting surface coal mining and reclamation operations outside Indian lands, any other business organization, and any agency, unit, or instrumentality of federal, state, or local government, including any publicly owned utility or publicly owned corporation of federal, state, or local government.

"Prime farmland" shall have the same meaning prescribed pursuant to the federal "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", as amended, and the regulations thereunder.

"Reclamation plan" means a plan submitted by an applicant under this article which sets forth a plan for reclamation of the proposed surface coal mining operations pursuant to section 34-33-111.

"Secretary" means the secretary of the United States department of the interior.

"Surface coal mining and reclamation operations" means surface coal mining operations and all activities necessary and incident to the reclamation of such operations.

"Surface coal mining operations" means:

Activities conducted on the surface of lands in connection with a surface coal mine or activities subject to the requirements of section 34-33-121 which involve surface operations and surface impacts incident to an underground coal mine. Such activities include excavation for the purpose of obtaining coal, including such common methods as contour, strip, auger, mountaintop removal, box cut, open pit, and area mining, removal of coal from coal mine waste disposal facilities, the use of explosives and blasting, and the use of in situ distillation or retorting, leaching or other chemical or physical processing, and the cleaning, concentrating, or other processing or preparation, loading of coal for interstate commerce at or near the mine site; except that such activities do not include any of the following: Coal exploration subject to section 34-33-117, the exploration and extraction of natural petroleum in a liquid or gaseous state by means of wells or pipe, or the extraction of geothermal resources.

The areas upon which such activities occur or where such activities disturb the natural land surface. Such areas shall also include any adjacent land the use of which is incidental to any such activities, all lands affected by the construction of new roads or the improvement or use of existing roads to gain access to the site of such activities and for haulage, and excavations, workings, impoundments, dams, ventilation shafts, entryways, refuse banks, dumps, stockpiles, overburden piles, spoil banks, culm banks, tailings, holes or depressions, repair areas, storage areas, processing areas, shipping areas, and other areas upon which are sited structures, facilities, or other property or materials on the surface, resulting from or incident to such activities.

"Technical revision" means a minor change, including incidental boundary revisions, to the terms or requirements of a permit issued under this article, which change shall not cause a significant alteration in the operator's reclamation plan.

"Unwarranted failure to comply" means the failure of a permittee to prevent the occurrence of any violation of his permit or any requirement of this article due to indifference, lack of diligence, or lack of reasonable care or the failure to abate any violation of such permit or this article due to indifference, lack of diligence, or lack of reasonable care.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1255, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(14) and (26)(a) amended, p. 1681, § 1, effective June 16.

L. 92:

(14), (21), and (26)(a) amended, p. 1894, § 1, effective May 29; (1) and (7) amended and (13.5) added, p. 1944, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(14), (21), and (26)(a) amended, p. 147, § 1, effective April 7.

L. 2006:

(1) and (7) amended, p. 217, § 14, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the federal "Historic Sites, Buildings, and Antiquities Act", see 16 U.S.C. §§ 461-467; for the federal "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", see 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.

34-33-104. Administration.

In addition to the duties and powers prescribed by the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., the office and board have the full power and authority to carry out and administer the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1258, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1945, § 49, effective July 1.

34-33-105. Jurisdiction of office and board.

The office and board shall have jurisdiction and authority over all persons and property, public and private, necessary to enforce the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1258, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1945, § 50, effective July 1.

34-33-106. Additional duties of division.

In addition to duties of the division set forth in article 32 of this title, the division shall:

Carry on a continuing review of the problems of surface coal mining and land reclamation in this state;

Cause to be published the monthly agenda of the board with a brief description of any affected land and the name of the applicant. These publications shall be in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the proposed surface coal mining operations listed in that month's agenda.

It is the duty of the department of agriculture, the department of higher education, the department of public health and environment, the state conservation board, the Colorado geological survey, the division of water resources, the division of parks and wildlife, the university of Colorado, Colorado state university, Colorado school of mines, and the state forester to furnish the board and its designees, as far as practicable, whatever data and technical assistance the board may request and deem necessary for the performance of reclamation and enforcement duties pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1258, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 515, § 7, effective July 1.

34-33-107. Powers of department.

The department may initiate and encourage studies and programs with the office and other appropriate state agencies relating to the development of less destructive methods of surface coal mining operations, better methods of land reclamation, more effective reclaimed land use, and coordination of the provisions of this article with the programs of other state agencies dealing with environmental, recreational, rehabilitation, and related concerns.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1258, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1945, § 51, effective July 1.

34-33-108. Rules and regulations - no more stringent.

On July 1, 1979, the board shall commence development of reasonable rules and regulations respecting the administration and enforcement of this article and, in conformance therewith, shall promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations pursuant to the provisions of section 24-4-103, C.R.S. Rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article shall be no more stringent than required to be as effective as the federal "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", as amended and federal regulations thereunder, unless the board makes a specific finding that either protection of the public safety or the environment requires a more stringent regulation. Nothing in this subsection (1) shall supercede rules in effect prior to May 29, 1992.

Any rule or regulation promulgated by the board which is required by a federal law, rule, or regulation shall become repealed and shall not be enforced when said federal law is repealed or said federal rule or regulation is deleted or withdrawn. Any provision of a permit issued under this article that is required by any rule of the board which is repealed in accordance with this subsection (2) shall not be enforceable. The repeal of such rule or regulation shall become effective ninety days after publication of the repeal in the federal register but, upon request, will be subject to a rule-making hearing by the board as set forth in article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1258, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1681, § 2, effective June 16; entire section amended, p. 1685, § 1, effective June 23.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1897, § 8, effective May 29.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 148, § 2, effective April 7.

Cross references:

For the federal "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", see 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.

34-33-109. Permits.

No later than eight months after the date on which a Colorado program is approved by the secretary pursuant to section 503 of the federal "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", as amended, (Pub.L. 95-87), such date to be determined and set forth in a rule of the board, no person shall conduct on lands within this state any surface coal mining and reclamation operations unless such person has first obtained a permit under this article; except that a person conducting surface coal mining and reclamation operations under an existing valid permit may conduct such operations beyond such date if an application for a permit has been filed in accordance with the provisions of this article, but the initial administrative decision has not been rendered; and except that no permit shall be required for reclamation operations on abandoned or unreclaimed lands not required to be reclaimed under state or federal law.

No later than two months following said approval of a Colorado program by the secretary, all operators of surface coal mines, operating on such date of approval and intending to operate such mines after the expiration of eight months from such approval of the Colorado program, shall file an application for a permit with the division; except that, with regard to the requirements of section 34-33-110 (2)(1), such application shall be considered filed for the purposes of this subsection (2) if it contains all applicable hydrologic information reasonably available to the applicant as of the date of the application.

If, upon such date of approval by the secretary of a Colorado program, a person has filed with the office an application for a permit in accordance with the "Colorado Mined Land Reclamation Act" and section 502 of said Pub.L. 95-87, and the office or board has not yet made a final decision on such application, the board or office shall, unless such application is withdrawn, act on such application in accordance with the "Colorado Mined Land Reclamation Act" and section 502 of Pub.L. 95-87; except that in no event shall such person be relieved of the obligation to obtain a permit as required by subsection (1) of this section and said Pub.L. 95-87.

No governmental office of the state, other than the board or office, nor any political subdivision of the state shall have the authority to require reclamation of lands affected or proposed to be affected by surface coal mining operations.

All permits issued pursuant to the requirements of this article shall be issued for a term not to exceed five years; except that, if the applicant demonstrates that a specified longer term is reasonably needed to allow the applicant to obtain necessary financing for equipment and the opening of the operation and if the application is full and complete for such specified longer term, the board or office may grant a permit for such longer term. A successor in interest to a permittee who applies for a new permit within thirty days after succeeding to such interest and who is able to obtain bond coverage the same as or equivalent to that of the original permittee may continue surface coal mining and reclamation operations according to the approved surface coal mining operations and reclamation plan of the original permittee until such successor's application is granted or denied.

A permit shall terminate if the permittee has not commenced the surface coal mining operations covered by such permit within three years after the issuance of the permit; except that the office or board may grant reasonable extensions of time upon a showing that such extensions are necessary by reason of litigation precluding such commencement or threatening substantial economic loss to the permittee or by reason of conditions beyond the control and without the fault or negligence of the permittee; except that, in the case of a coal lease issued under the federal "Mineral Lands Leasing Act", as amended, extensions of time may not extend beyond the period allowed for diligent development in accordance with section 7 of that act; and except that, with respect to coal to be mined for use in a synthetic fuel facility or specific major electric generating facility, the permittee shall be deemed to have commenced surface coal mining operations at such time as the construction of the synthetic fuel or generating facility is initiated.

Any permit issued pursuant to this article shall carry with it the right of successive renewal upon expiration with respect to permit areas. The holder of the permit may apply for renewal, and such renewal shall be issued subsequent to fulfillment of the public notice requirements of sections 34-33-118 and 34-33-119, unless it is established by a preponderance of the evidence and written findings by the board are made that:

The terms and conditions of the existing permit are not being satisfactorily met; except that renewal may be granted to the holder of the permit on the condition that the holder of the permit demonstrates that said holder of the permit is meeting and will continue to meet a schedule agreed to by such holder of the permit and the office for correcting any permit violation, consistent with section 34-33-123;

The present surface coal mining and reclamation operation is not in compliance with the environmental protection standards of this article or regulations promulgated thereunder;

The renewal requested substantially jeopardizes the operator's continuing responsibility on existing permit areas;

The operator has not provided evidence that the performance bond in effect for said operation will continue in full force and effect for any renewal requested in such application as well as any additional bond the board or office might require pursuant to section 34-33-113; or

Any additional revised or updated information required by the office has not been provided.

Prior to the approval of any renewal of permit, the office shall provide notice to the United States office of surface mining reclamation and enforcement, to the surface and mineral owners of record of the affected land, and to the board of county commissioners of the county in which the affected land is located.

If an application for renewal of a permit includes a proposal to extend the surface coal mining and reclamation operations beyond the existing permit area, the portion of the application for renewal which addresses any new land areas shall be subject to the full standards applicable to new applications under this article; except that, if the surface coal mining and reclamation operations authorized by a permit issued pursuant to this article were not subject to the standards contained in section 34-33-114 (2)(e)(I) by reason of the exception provided in section 34-33-114 (2)(e)(II), the portion of the application for renewal of the permit which addresses any new land areas previously identified in the reclamation plan submitted pursuant to section 34-33-111 shall not be subject to the standards contained in section 34-33-114 (2)(e)(I).

Any permit renewal shall be for an additional term not to exceed the period of the original permit established by this article. Application for a permit renewal shall be made at least one hundred eighty days prior to the expiration of the existing permit. The office shall mail to the operator notice of the need to renew such permit at least ninety days prior to the final date for permit renewal.

In any hearing on renewal of a permit, the burden of persuasion shall be on the opponents of renewal.

The holder of a valid permit may continue surface mining operations under said permit, subject to section 34-33-123, beyond the expiration date until a final administrative decision on renewal is rendered if a renewal application is received by the office at least one hundred eighty days prior to the expiration date of the permit.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1258, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(3) to (6), (7)(a)(I), (7)(a)(IV), (7)(a)(V), (7)(b), (7)(d), and (7)(f) amended, p. 1945, § 52, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the federal "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", see 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq; for the federal "Mineral Leasing Act", also popularly known as the "Mineral Lands Leasing Act", see 30 U.S.C. § 181 et seq; for the "Colorado Mined Land Reclamation Act", see article 32 of this title.

34-33-110. Application for permit.

Any person desiring to obtain a permit to perform surface coal mining and reclamation operations shall make written application therefor to the office on forms approved by the board. Each application shall be submitted pursuant to the provisions of this article and shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty-five dollars, plus ten dollars for each acre of affected land; except that such fee shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars and shall not exceed the actual or anticipated cost of reviewing, administering, and enforcing such permit issued pursuant to this article. The board shall develop procedures so as to enable the cost of the fee to be paid over the term of the permit. All fees collected under the provisions of this article shall be deposited in the general fund.

The permit application shall include the following:

The name of the applicant and the address and telephone number of the general office and the local office of the applicant;

The names and addresses of:

Every legal owner of record of the property (surface and mineral) to be mined;

The holders of record of any leasehold interests in the property;

Any purchaser of record of the property under a real estate contract;

The operator, if he is a person different from the applicant;

The owners of record of all surface and subsurface property interests adjacent to any part of the permit area;

If any of the entities described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (2) are business entities other than a single proprietor, the names and addresses of the principals, officers, and resident agent;

A statement of any current or previous surface coal mining permits held by the applicant for operations in the United States and the permit identification in each pending application;

If the applicant is a partnership, corporation, association, or other business entity, where applicable, the names and addresses of every officer, partner, director, or person performing a function similar to a director, of the applicant, together with the name and address of any person owning of record ten percent or more of any class of voting stock of the applicant and a list of all names under which the applicant, partner, or principal shareholder previously operated a surface coal mining operation in the United States within the five-year period preceding the date of submission of the application;

A statement of whether the applicant or any subsidiary, affiliate, or person controlled by or under common control with the applicant has ever held any federal or state mining permit for surface coal mining operations which, in the five-year period prior to the date of submission of the application, has been suspended or revoked or has had a mining bond or similar security deposited in lieu of bond forfeited and, if so, a brief explanation of the facts involved;

A copy of the applicant's notification to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the proposed site at least once a week for four successive weeks, which notification shall include the names of every legal owner of record of property (surface and mineral) in the proposed site, a description of the exact location and boundaries of the proposed site sufficient so that the proposed operation is readily locatable by local residents, and the location at which the application is available for public inspection;

A description of the type and method of surface coal mining operation that exists or is proposed, the engineering techniques used or proposed, and the equipment used or proposed;

The anticipated or actual starting and termination dates of each phase of the surface coal mining operation and the number of acres of land to be affected;

An accurate map or plan, of an appropriate scale, clearly showing the land to be affected as of the date of the application and the area of land within the permit area upon which the applicant has the legal right to enter and commence surface coal mining operations and a statement of those documents upon which the applicant bases such legal right to enter and commence surface coal mining operations on the area affected and whether that right is the subject of pending court litigation; except that nothing in this article shall be construed as vesting in the board or office the jurisdiction to adjudicate property rights disputes;

The name of the watershed and location of the surface stream or tributary into which surface and pit drainage will be discharged;

A determination of the probable hydrologic consequences of the surface coal mining and reclamation operations, both on and off the mine site, with respect to the hydrologic regime and the quantity and quality of water in surface and groundwater systems, including the dissolved and suspended solids under seasonal flow conditions and the collection of sufficient data for the mine site and surrounding areas, so that an assessment can be made by the office of the probable cumulative impacts of all anticipated mining in the area upon the hydrology of the area and particularly upon water availability;

When requested by the office, the climatological factors that are unique to the locality of the land to be affected, including the average seasonal precipitation, the average direction and velocity of prevailing winds, and the seasonal temperature ranges;

Accurate maps or plans, of an appropriate scale, clearly showing the land to be affected as of the date of application and all types of information set forth on topographical maps of the United States geological survey of a scale of one to twenty-four thousand or one to twenty-five thousand or larger, including all manmade features and significant known archeological sites existing on the date of application. Such maps or plans shall show, among other things specified by the office, all boundaries of the land to be affected, the boundary lines and names of present owners of record of all surface areas abutting the permit area, and the location of all buildings within one thousand feet of the permit area.

Cross sections, maps, or plans of the land to be affected, including the actual area to be mined, prepared by or under the direction of and certified by a qualified licensed professional engineer or professional geologist, showing pertinent elevation and location of test borings or core samplings and depicting the following: The nature and depth of the various strata of overburden; the location of subsurface water, if encountered, and its quality; the nature and thickness of any coal or rider seam above the coal seam to be mined; the nature of the stratum immediately beneath the coal seam to be mined; all coal crop lines and the strike and dip of the coal to be mined, within the area of land to be affected; existing or previous surface mining limits; the location and extent of known workings of any underground mines, including mine openings to the surface; the location of aquifers; the estimated elevation of the water table; the location of spoil, waste, or refuse areas and topsoil preservation areas; the location of all impoundments for waste or erosion control; the location of any settling or water treatment facility; the location of constructed or natural drainways and the location of any discharges to any surface body of water on the area of land to be affected or adjacent thereto; and profiles at appropriate cross sections of the anticipated final surface configuration that will be achieved pursuant to the operator's proposed reclamation plan;

A statement of the result of test borings or core samplings from the permit area, including logs of the drill holes; the thickness of the coal seam; and an analysis of the chemical and physical properties, including sulphur content, of such coal; a chemical analysis of potentially acid-forming or toxic-forming sections of the overburden; and a chemical analysis of the stratum lying immediately underneath the coal to be mined; except that the provisions of this paragraph (p) may be waived by the board or office with respect to the specific application by a written determination that such requirements are unnecessary; and

For those lands in the permit application which a reconnaissance inspection suggests may be prime farmlands, a soil survey made or obtained according to standards established by the secretary of the United States department of agriculture in order to confirm the exact location of such prime farmlands, if any.

Each applicant shall be required to submit to the office as part of the permit application a reclamation plan which shall meet the requirements of this article.

Each applicant shall file a copy of the application for public inspection with the county clerk and recorder of the county where the surface coal mining operations are proposed to occur, or any other public office, subject to regulations issued by the board, except for that information pertaining to the coal seam itself.

Each applicant shall be required to submit to the office as part of the permit application evidence that the applicant has satisfied other state or federal self-insurance requirements or a certificate issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in the United States certifying that the applicant has a public liability insurance policy in force for the surface coal mining and reclamation operations for which such permit is sought. Such policy shall provide for personal injury and property damage protection in an amount adequate to compensate any persons damaged as a result of surface coal mining and reclamation operations, including use of explosives, and entitled to compensation under the applicable provisions of state law. Such policy shall be maintained in full force and effect during the term of the permit or any renewal, including the term of all reclamation operations.

Each applicant shall submit to the office as part of the permit application a blasting plan which shall outline the procedures and standards by which the operator will meet the provisions of section 34-33-120 (2)(o).

Information pertaining to coal seams, test borings, core samplings, or soil samples as required by this section shall be made available to any person with an interest which is or may be adversely affected; except that information which pertains to the quantity of coal or the analysis of the chemical and physical properties of the coal (excepting that information which the office reasonably believes to concern a mineral or elemental content which is potentially toxic in the environment) shall be kept confidential and not made a matter of public record.

The permit application, including the reclamation plan, shall contain such other information, in addition to that required by this section or by section 34-33-111, or regulations promulgated thereunder, as the office deems necessary; except that requests by the office for such additional information shall be based upon good cause shown in terms of site specific needs and shall bear a reasonable relationship to the purposes and provisions of this article. Any applicant or operator shall have the right, at any regular meeting of the board, upon proper notice, to seek the informal opinion of the board concerning any information request or requirement made by the office in connection with the permit application or reclamation plan contained therein, and such informal opinion shall not be binding on any of the parties.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1261, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(4) amended, p. 1895, § 2, effective May 29; (1), (2)(j), (2)(l), (2)(m), (2)(n), (2)(p), (3), and (5) to (8) amended, p. 1947, § 53, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2)(o) amended, p. 1314, § 67, effective May 28.